Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208.02
Insurance companies; organization;
subscriptions to stock; permit.

If the Director of Insurance
approves the forms of subscriptions for capital stock or the forms of application
for membership or for insurance, the corporate surety on the bond required
by section 44-208.01, and, in the case of stock insurers, the application
to solicit subscriptions for stock, he or she shall deliver to the promoter
or incorporators a permit in the name of the corporation authorizing it to
complete its organization. Upon receiving such permit, the corporation shall
have authority to solicit subscriptions and payments for capital stock if
a stock insurer and applications and premiums or advance assessments for insurance
if other than a stock insurer and to exercise such powers, subject to the
limitations imposed by the Nebraska
Model Business Corporation Act and Chapter 44, as may be necessary
and proper in completing its organization and qualifying for a license to
transact the kind or kinds of insurance proposed in its articles of incorporation.
No corporation shall issue policies or enter into contracts of insurance until
it receives a certificate of authority permitting it to do so.

Laws 1957, c. 178, § 3, p. 613;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 51;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 217;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 282.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.